Illinois, session 104th, SB3629.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-12020 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12020)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-458)8    Sec. 5-12020. Commercial wind energy facilities and 9commercial solar energy facilities. 10    (a) As used in this Section:11    "Commercial solar energy facility" means a "commercial 12solar energy system" as defined in Section 10-720 of the 13Property Tax Code. "Commercial solar energy facility" does not 14mean a utility-scale solar energy facility being constructed 15at a site that was eligible to participate in a procurement 16event conducted by the Illinois Power Agency pursuant to 17subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 18Act. 19    "Commercial wind energy facility" means a wind energy 20conversion facility of equal or greater than 500 kilowatts in 21total nameplate generating capacity. "Commercial wind energy 22facility" includes a wind energy conversion facility seeking 23an extension of a permit to construct granted by a county or   SB3629- 2 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1municipality before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 2Public Act 102-1123).3    "Facility owner" means (i) a person with a direct 4ownership interest in a commercial wind energy facility or a 5commercial solar energy facility, or both, regardless of 6whether the person is involved in acquiring the necessary 7rights, permits, and approvals or otherwise planning for the 8construction and operation of the facility, and (ii) at the 9time the facility is being developed, a person who is acting as 10a developer of the facility by acquiring the necessary rights, 11permits, and approvals or by planning for the construction and 12operation of the facility, regardless of whether the person 13will own or operate the facility.14    "Nonparticipating property" means real property that is 15not a participating property.16    "Nonparticipating residence" means a residence that is 17located on nonparticipating property and that is existing and 18occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 19develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 20solar energy facility is filed with the county.21    "Occupied community building" means any one or more of the 22following buildings that is existing and occupied on the date 23that the application for a permit to develop the commercial 24wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 25is filed with the county: a school, place of worship, day care 26facility, public library, or community center.  SB3629- 3 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1    "Participating property" means real property that is the 2subject of a written agreement between a facility owner and 3the owner of the real property that provides the facility 4owner an easement, option, lease, or license to use the real 5property for the purpose of constructing a commercial wind 6energy facility, a commercial solar energy facility, or 7supporting facilities. "Participating property" also includes 8real property that is owned by a facility owner for the purpose 9of constructing a commercial wind energy facility, a 10commercial solar energy facility, or supporting facilities.11    "Participating residence" means a residence that is 12located on participating property and that is existing and 13occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 14develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 15solar energy facility is filed with the county.16    "Protected lands" means real property that is: 17        (1) subject to a permanent conservation right 18    consistent with the Real Property Conservation Rights Act; 19    or 20        (2) registered or designated as a nature preserve, 21    buffer, or land and water reserve under the Illinois 22    Natural Areas Preservation Act. 23    "Supporting facilities" means the transmission lines, 24substations, access roads, meteorological towers, storage 25containers, and equipment associated with the generation and 26storage of electricity by the commercial wind energy facility   SB3629- 4 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1or commercial solar energy facility.2    "Wind tower" includes the wind turbine tower, nacelle, and 3blades. 4    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or whether 5the county has formed a zoning commission and adopted formal 6zoning under Section 5-12007, a county may establish standards 7for commercial wind energy facilities, commercial solar energy 8facilities, or both. The standards may include all of the 9requirements specified in this Section but may not include 10requirements for commercial wind energy facilities or 11commercial solar energy facilities that are more restrictive 12than specified in this Section. A county may also regulate the 13siting of commercial wind energy facilities with standards 14that are not more restrictive than the requirements specified 15in this Section in unincorporated areas of the county that are 16outside the zoning jurisdiction of a municipality and that are 17outside the 1.5-mile radius surrounding the zoning 18jurisdiction of a municipality. 19    (c) If a county has elected to establish standards under 20subsection (b), before the county grants siting approval or a 21special use permit for a commercial wind energy facility or a 22commercial solar energy facility, or modification of an 23approved siting or special use permit, the county board of the 24county in which the facility is to be sited or the zoning board 25of appeals for the county shall hold at least one public 26hearing. The public hearing shall be conducted in accordance   SB3629- 5 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1with the Open Meetings Act and shall be held not more than 60 2days after the filing of the application for the facility. The 3county shall allow interested parties to a special use permit 4an opportunity to present evidence and to cross-examine 5witnesses at the hearing, but the county may impose reasonable 6restrictions on the public hearing, including reasonable time 7limitations on the presentation of evidence and the 8cross-examination of witnesses. The county shall also allow 9public comment at the public hearing in accordance with the 10Open Meetings Act. The county shall make its siting and 11permitting decisions not more than 30 days after the 12conclusion of the public hearing. Notice of the hearing shall 13be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the 14county. A facility owner must enter into an agricultural 15impact mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture 16prior to the date of the required public hearing. A commercial 17wind energy facility owner seeking an extension of a permit 18granted by a county prior to July 24, 2015 (the effective date 19of Public Act 99-132) must enter into an agricultural impact 20mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture prior 21to a decision by the county to grant the permit extension. 22Counties may allow test wind towers or test solar energy 23systems to be sited without formal approval by the county 24board.25    (d) A county with an existing zoning ordinance in conflict 26with this Section shall amend that zoning ordinance to be in   SB3629- 6 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1compliance with this Section within 120 days after January 27, 22023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123).3    (e) A county may require: 4        (1) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 5    to be sited as follows, with setback distances measured 6    from the center of the base of the wind tower:  7Setback Description           Setback Distance 8Occupied Community            2.1 times the maximum blade tip9Buildings                     height of the wind tower to the10                              nearest point on the outside11                              wall of the structure 12Participating Residences      1.1 times the maximum blade tip13                              height of the wind tower to the14                              nearest point on the outside15                              wall of the structure 16Nonparticipating Residences   2.1 times the maximum blade tip17                              height of the wind tower to the18                              nearest point on the outside19                              wall of the structure 20Boundary Lines of             None21Participating Property    SB3629- 7 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1Boundary Lines of             1.1 times the maximum blade tip2Nonparticipating Property     height of the wind tower to the3                              nearest point on the property4                              line of the nonparticipating5                              property 6Public Road Rights-of-Way     1.1 times the maximum blade tip7                              height of the wind tower8                              to the center point of the9                              public road right-of-way 10Overhead Communication and    1.1 times the maximum blade tip11Electric Transmission         height of the wind tower to the12and Distribution Facilities   nearest edge of the property13(Not Including Overhead       line, easement, or 14Utility Service Lines to      right-of-way 15Individual Houses or          containing the overhead line16Outbuildings) 17Overhead Utility Service      None18Lines to Individual19Houses or Outbuildings 20Fish and Wildlife Areas       2.1 times the maximum blade21and Illinois Nature           tip height of the wind tower  SB3629- 8 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1Preserve Commission           to the nearest point on the2Protected Lands               property line of the fish and3                              wildlife area or protected4                              land5    This Section does not exempt or excuse compliance with 6    electric facility clearances approved or required by the 7    National Electrical Code, the National Electrical Safety 8    Code, the Illinois Commerce Commission, and the Federal 9    Energy Regulatory Commission and their designees or 10    successors; 11        (2) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 12    to be sited so that industry standard computer modeling 13    indicates that any occupied community building or 14    nonparticipating residence will not experience more than 15    30 hours per year of shadow flicker under planned 16    operating conditions;17        (3) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited as 18    follows, with setback distances measured from the nearest 19    edge of any component of the facility:  20Setback Description           Setback Distance 21Occupied Community            150 feet from the nearest22Buildings and Dwellings on    point on the outside wall 23Nonparticipating Properties   of the structure   SB3629- 9 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1Boundary Lines of             None2Participating Property     3Public Road Rights-of-Way     50 feet from the nearest4                              edge 5Boundary Lines of             50 feet to the nearest6Nonparticipating Property     point on the property7                              line of the nonparticipating8                              property 9        (4) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 10    that the facility's perimeter is enclosed by fencing 11    having a height of at least 6 feet and no more than 25 12    feet; and 13        (5) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 14    that no component of a solar panel has a height of more 15    than 20 feet above ground when the solar energy facility's 16    arrays are at full tilt. 17    The requirements set forth in this subsection (e) may be 18waived subject to the written consent of the owner of each 19affected nonparticipating property.20    (f) A county may not set a sound limitation for wind towers 21in commercial wind energy facilities or any components in 22commercial solar energy facilities that is more restrictive 23than the sound limitations established by the Illinois   SB3629- 10 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1Pollution Control Board under 35 Ill. Adm. Code Parts 900, 2901, and 910.3    (g) A county may not place any restriction on the 4installation or use of a commercial wind energy facility or a 5commercial solar energy facility unless it adopts an ordinance 6that complies with this Section. A county may not establish 7siting standards for supporting facilities that preclude 8development of commercial wind energy facilities or commercial 9solar energy facilities. 10    A request for siting approval or a special use permit for a 11commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 12facility, or modification of an approved siting or special use 13permit, shall be approved if the request is in compliance with 14the standards and conditions imposed in this Act, the zoning 15ordinance adopted consistent with this Code, and the 16conditions imposed under State and federal statutes and 17regulations. 18    (h) A county may not adopt zoning regulations that 19disallow, permanently or temporarily, commercial wind energy 20facilities or commercial solar energy facilities from being 21developed or operated in any district zoned to allow 22agricultural or industrial uses. 23    (i) A county may not require permit application fees for a 24commercial wind energy facility or commercial solar energy 25facility that are unreasonable. All application fees imposed 26by the county shall be consistent with fees for projects in the   SB3629- 11 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1county with similar capital value and cost. 2    (j) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a county 3shall not require standards for construction, decommissioning, 4or deconstruction of a commercial wind energy facility or 5commercial solar energy facility or related financial 6assurances that are more restrictive than those included in 7the Department of Agriculture's standard wind farm 8agricultural impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, or 9standard solar agricultural impact mitigation agreement, 10version 8.19.19, as applicable and in effect on December 31, 112022. The amount of any decommissioning payment shall be in 12accordance with the financial assurance required by those 13agricultural impact mitigation agreements. 14    (j-5) A commercial wind energy facility or a commercial 15solar energy facility shall file a farmland drainage plan with 16the county and impacted drainage districts outlining how 17surface and subsurface drainage of farmland will be restored 18during and following construction or deconstruction of the 19facility. The plan is to be created independently by the 20facility developer and shall include the location of any 21potentially impacted drainage district facilities to the 22extent this information is publicly available from the county 23or the drainage district, plans to repair any subsurface 24drainage affected during construction or deconstruction using 25procedures outlined in the agricultural impact mitigation 26agreement entered into by the commercial wind energy facility   SB3629- 12 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1owner or commercial solar energy facility owner, and 2procedures for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 3affected during construction or deconstruction. All surface 4and subsurface damage shall be repaired as soon as reasonably 5practicable. 6    (k) A county may not condition approval of a commercial 7wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility on a 8property value guarantee and may not require a facility owner 9to pay into a neighboring property devaluation escrow account. 10    (l) A county may require certain vegetative screening 11surrounding a commercial wind energy facility or commercial 12solar energy facility but may not require earthen berms or 13similar structures. 14    (m) A county may set blade tip height limitations for wind 15towers in commercial wind energy facilities but may not set a 16blade tip height limitation that is more restrictive than the 17height allowed under a Determination of No Hazard to Air 18Navigation by the Federal Aviation Administration under 14 CFR 19Part 77.20    (n) A county may require that a commercial wind energy 21facility owner or commercial solar energy facility owner 22provide:23        (1) the results and recommendations from consultation 24    with the Illinois Department of Natural Resources that are 25    obtained through the Ecological Compliance Assessment Tool 26    (EcoCAT) or a comparable successor tool; and  SB3629- 13 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1        (2) the results of the United States Fish and Wildlife 2    Service's Information for Planning and Consulting 3    environmental review or a comparable successor tool that 4    is consistent with (i) the "U.S. Fish and Wildlife 5    Service's Land-Based Wind Energy Guidelines" and (ii) any 6    applicable United States Fish and Wildlife Service solar 7    wildlife guidelines that have been subject to public 8    review. 9    (o) A county may require a commercial wind energy facility 10or commercial solar energy facility to adhere to the 11recommendations provided by the Illinois Department of Natural 12Resources in an EcoCAT natural resource review report under 17 13Ill. Adm. Code Part 1075. 14    (p) A county may require a facility owner to:15        (1) demonstrate avoidance of protected lands as 16    identified by the Illinois Department of Natural Resources 17    and the Illinois Nature Preserve Commission; or18        (2) consider the recommendations of the Illinois 19    Department of Natural Resources for setbacks from 20    protected lands, including areas identified by the 21    Illinois Nature Preserve Commission.22    (q) A county may require that a facility owner provide 23evidence of consultation with the Illinois State Historic 24Preservation Office to assess potential impacts on 25State-registered historic sites under the Illinois State 26Agency Historic Resources Preservation Act.   SB3629- 14 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1    (r) To maximize community benefits, including, but not 2limited to, reduced stormwater runoff, flooding, and erosion 3at the ground mounted solar energy system, improved soil 4health, and increased foraging habitat for game birds, 5songbirds, and pollinators, a county may (1) require a 6commercial solar energy facility owner to plant, establish, 7and maintain for the life of the facility vegetative ground 8cover, consistent with the goals of the Pollinator-Friendly 9Solar Site Act and (2) require the submittal of a vegetation 10management plan that is in compliance with the agricultural 11impact mitigation agreement in the application to construct 12and operate a commercial solar energy facility in the county 13if the vegetative ground cover and vegetation management plan 14comply with the requirements of the underlying agreement with 15the landowner or landowners where the facility will be 16constructed. 17    No later than 90 days after January 27, 2023 (the 18effective date of Public Act 102-1123), the Illinois 19Department of Natural Resources shall develop guidelines for 20vegetation management plans that may be required under this 21subsection for commercial solar energy facilities. The 22guidelines must include guidance for short-term and long-term 23property management practices that provide and maintain native 24and non-invasive naturalized perennial vegetation to protect 25the health and well-being of pollinators. 26    (s) If a facility owner enters into a road use agreement   SB3629- 15 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1with the Illinois Department of Transportation, a road 2district, or other unit of local government relating to a 3commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 4facility, the road use agreement shall require the facility 5owner to be responsible for (i) the reasonable cost of 6improving roads used by the facility owner to construct the 7commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy 8facility and (ii) the reasonable cost of repairing roads used 9by the facility owner during construction of the commercial 10wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 11so that those roads are in a condition that is safe for the 12driving public after the completion of the facility's 13construction. Roadways improved in preparation for and during 14the construction of the commercial wind energy facility or 15commercial solar energy facility shall be repaired and 16restored to the improved condition at the reasonable cost of 17the developer if the roadways have degraded or were damaged as 18a result of construction-related activities.19    The road use agreement shall not require the facility 20owner to pay costs, fees, or charges for road work that is not 21specifically and uniquely attributable to the construction of 22the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 23energy facility. Road-related fees, permit fees, or other 24charges imposed by the Illinois Department of Transportation, 25a road district, or other unit of local government under a road 26use agreement with the facility owner shall be reasonably   SB3629- 16 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1related to the cost of administration of the road use 2agreement. 3    (s-5) The facility owner shall also compensate landowners 4for crop losses or other agricultural damages resulting from 5damage to the drainage system caused by the construction of 6the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 7energy facility. The commercial wind energy facility owner or 8commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair or pay for 9the repair of all damage to the subsurface drainage system 10caused by the construction of the commercial wind energy 11facility or the commercial solar energy facility in accordance 12with the agriculture impact mitigation agreement requirements 13for repair of drainage. The commercial wind energy facility 14owner or commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair 15or pay for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 16caused by the construction or deconstruction of the commercial 17wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 18as soon as reasonably practicable. 19    (t) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a facility 20owner with siting approval from a county to construct a 21commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 22facility is authorized to cross or impact a drainage system, 23including, but not limited to, drainage tiles, open drainage 24ditches, culverts, and water gathering vaults, owned or under 25the control of a drainage district under the Illinois Drainage 26Code without obtaining prior agreement or approval from the   SB3629- 17 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1drainage district in accordance with the farmland drainage 2plan required by subsection (j-5). 3    (u) The amendments to this Section adopted in Public Act 4102-1123 do not apply to: (1) an application for siting 5approval or for a special use permit for a commercial wind 6energy facility or commercial solar energy facility if the 7application was submitted to a unit of local government before 8January 27, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123); 9(2) a commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar 10energy facility if the facility owner has submitted an 11agricultural impact mitigation agreement to the Department of 12Agriculture before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 13Public Act 102-1123); or (3) a commercial wind energy or 14commercial solar energy development on property that is 15located within an enterprise zone certified under the Illinois 16Enterprise Zone Act, that was classified as industrial by the 17appropriate zoning authority on or before January 27, 2023, 18and that is located within 4 miles of the intersection of 19Interstate 88 and Interstate 39. 20(Source: P.A. 103-81, eff. 6-9-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 21104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 22    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-458)23    Sec. 5-12020. Commercial wind energy facilities and 24commercial solar energy facilities. 25    (a) As used in this Section:  SB3629- 18 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1    "Commercial solar energy facility" means a "commercial 2solar energy system" as defined in Section 10-720 of the 3Property Tax Code. "Commercial solar energy facility" does not 4mean a utility-scale solar energy facility being constructed 5at a site that was eligible to participate in a procurement 6event conducted by the Illinois Power Agency pursuant to 7subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 8Act. 9    "Commercial wind energy facility" means a wind energy 10conversion facility of equal or greater than 500 kilowatts in 11total nameplate generating capacity. "Commercial wind energy 12facility" includes a wind energy conversion facility seeking 13an extension of a permit to construct granted by a county or 14municipality before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 15Public Act 102-1123).16    "Facility owner" means (i) a person with a direct 17ownership interest in a commercial wind energy facility or a 18commercial solar energy facility, or both, regardless of 19whether the person is involved in acquiring the necessary 20rights, permits, and approvals or otherwise planning for the 21construction and operation of the facility, and (ii) at the 22time the facility is being developed, a person who is acting as 23a developer of the facility by acquiring the necessary rights, 24permits, and approvals or by planning for the construction and 25operation of the facility, regardless of whether the person 26will own or operate the facility.  SB3629- 19 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1    "Nonparticipating property" means real property that is 2not a participating property.3    "Nonparticipating residence" means a residence that is 4located on nonparticipating property and that is existing and 5occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 6develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 7solar energy facility is filed with the county.8    "Occupied community building" means any one or more of the 9following buildings that is existing and occupied on the date 10that the application for a permit to develop the commercial 11wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 12is filed with the county: a school, place of worship, day care 13facility, public library, or community center.14    "Participating property" means real property that is the 15subject of a written agreement between a facility owner and 16the owner of the real property that provides the facility 17owner an easement, option, lease, or license to use the real 18property for the purpose of constructing a commercial wind 19energy facility, a commercial solar energy facility, or 20supporting facilities. "Participating property" also includes 21real property that is owned by a facility owner for the purpose 22of constructing a commercial wind energy facility, a 23commercial solar energy facility, or supporting facilities.24    "Participating residence" means a residence that is 25located on participating property and that is existing and 26occupied on the date that an application for a permit to   SB3629- 20 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 2solar energy facility is filed with the county.3    "Protected lands" means real property that is: 4        (1) subject to a permanent conservation right 5    consistent with the Real Property Conservation Rights Act; 6    or 7        (2) registered or designated as a nature preserve, 8    buffer, or land and water reserve under the Illinois 9    Natural Areas Preservation Act.10    "Supporting facilities" means the transmission lines, 11substations, access roads, meteorological towers, storage 12containers, and equipment associated with the generation and 13storage of electricity by the commercial wind energy facility 14or commercial solar energy facility. "Supporting facilities" 15includes energy storage systems capable of absorbing energy 16and storing it for use at a later time, including, but not 17limited to, batteries and other electrochemical and 18electromechanical technologies or systems. 19    "Wind tower" includes the wind turbine tower, nacelle, and 20blades. 21    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or whether 22the county has formed a zoning commission and adopted formal 23zoning under Section 5-12007, a county may establish standards 24for commercial wind energy facilities, commercial solar energy 25facilities, or both. The standards may include all of the 26requirements specified in this Section but may not include   SB3629- 21 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1requirements for commercial wind energy facilities or 2commercial solar energy facilities that are more restrictive 3than specified in this Section. A county may also regulate the 4siting of commercial wind energy facilities with standards 5that are not more restrictive than the requirements specified 6in this Section in unincorporated areas of the county that are 7outside the zoning jurisdiction of a municipality and that are 8outside the 1.5-mile radius surrounding the zoning 9jurisdiction of a municipality. A county may also regulate the 10siting of commercial solar energy facilities with standards 11that are not more restrictive than the requirements specified 12in this Section in unincorporated areas of the county that are 13outside of the zoning jurisdiction of a municipality. 14    (c) If a county has elected to establish standards under 15subsection (b), before the county grants siting approval or a 16special use permit for a commercial wind energy facility or a 17commercial solar energy facility, or modification of an 18approved siting or special use permit, the county board of the 19county in which the facility is to be sited or the zoning board 20of appeals for the county shall hold at least one public 21hearing. The public hearing shall be conducted in accordance 22with the Open Meetings Act and shall conclude not more than 60 23days after the filing of the application for the facility. The 24county shall allow interested parties to a special use permit 25an opportunity to present evidence and to cross-examine 26witnesses at the hearing, but the county may impose reasonable   SB3629- 22 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1restrictions on the public hearing, including reasonable time 2limitations on the presentation of evidence and the 3cross-examination of witnesses. The county shall also allow 4public comment at the public hearing in accordance with the 5Open Meetings Act. The county shall make its siting and 6permitting decisions not more than 30 days after the 7conclusion of the public hearing. Notice of the hearing shall 8be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the 9county. A facility owner must enter into an agricultural 10impact mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture 11prior to the date of the required public hearing. A commercial 12wind energy facility owner seeking an extension of a permit 13granted by a county prior to July 24, 2015 (the effective date 14of Public Act 99-132) must enter into an agricultural impact 15mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture prior 16to a decision by the county to grant the permit extension. 17Counties may allow test wind towers or test solar energy 18systems to be sited without formal approval by the county 19board.20    (d) A county with an existing zoning ordinance in conflict 21with this Section shall amend that zoning ordinance to be in 22compliance with this Section within 120 days after January 27, 232023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123).24    (e) A county may require: 25        (1) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 26    to be sited as follows, with setback distances measured   SB3629- 23 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1    from the center of the base of the wind tower:  2Setback Description           Setback Distance 3Occupied Community            2.1 times the maximum blade tip4Buildings                     height of the wind tower to the5                              nearest point on the outside6                              wall of the structure 7Participating Residences      1.1 times the maximum blade tip8                              height of the wind tower to the9                              nearest point on the outside10                              wall of the structure 11Nonparticipating Residences   2.1 times the maximum blade tip12                              height of the wind tower to the13                              nearest point on the outside14                              wall of the structure 15Boundary Lines of             None16Participating Property  17Boundary Lines of             1.1 times the maximum blade tip18Nonparticipating Property     height of the wind tower to the19                              nearest point on the property20                              line of the nonparticipating  SB3629- 24 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1                              property 2Public Road Rights-of-Way     1.1 times the maximum blade tip3                              height of the wind tower4                              to the center point of the5                              public road right-of-way 6Overhead Communication and    1.1 times the maximum blade tip7Electric Transmission         height of the wind tower to the8and Distribution Facilities   nearest edge of the property9(Not Including Overhead       line, easement, or 10Utility Service Lines to      right-of-way 11Individual Houses or          containing the overhead line12Outbuildings) 13Overhead Utility Service      None14Lines to Individual15Houses or Outbuildings 16Fish and Wildlife Areas       2.1 times the maximum blade17and Illinois Nature           tip height of the wind tower18Preserve Commission           to the nearest point on the19Protected Lands               property line of the fish and20                              wildlife area or protected21                              land22    This Section does not exempt or excuse compliance with   SB3629- 25 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1    electric facility clearances approved or required by the 2    National Electrical Code, the National Electrical Safety 3    Code, the Illinois Commerce Commission, and the Federal 4    Energy Regulatory Commission and their designees or 5    successors; 6        (2) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 7    to be sited so that industry standard computer modeling 8    indicates that any occupied community building or 9    nonparticipating residence will not experience more than 10    30 hours per year of shadow flicker under planned 11    operating conditions;12        (3) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited as 13    follows, with setback distances measured from the nearest 14    edge of any above-ground component of the facility, 15    excluding fencing:  16Setback Description           Setback Distance 17Occupied Community            150 feet from the nearest18Buildings and Dwellings on    point on the outside wall 19Nonparticipating Properties   of the structure 20Boundary Lines of             None21Participating Property     22Public Road Rights-of-Way     50 feet from the nearest  SB3629- 26 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1                              edge of the public 2                              right-of-way  3Boundary Lines of             50 feet to the nearest4Nonparticipating Property     point on the property5                              line of the nonparticipating6                              property 7        (4) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 8    that the facility's perimeter is enclosed by fencing 9    having a height of at least 6 feet and no more than 25 10    feet; and 11        (5) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 12    that no component of a solar panel has a height of more 13    than 20 feet above ground when the solar energy facility's 14    arrays are at full tilt.15    This subsection (e) shall not preclude the ability of a 16county to require a reasonable setback distance between 17fencing and public rights-of-way if the requirement is not 18specific to commercial wind energy facilities or commercial 19solar energy facilities and does not preclude the development 20of commercial wind energy facilities or commercial solar 21energy facilities or the ability of commercial wind energy 22facilities or commercial solar energy facilities to comply 23with the requirements set forth in this subsection (e). 24    The requirements set forth in this subsection (e) may be   SB3629- 27 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1waived subject to the written consent of the owner of each 2affected nonparticipating property.3    (f) A county may not set a sound limitation for wind towers 4in commercial wind energy facilities or any components in 5commercial solar energy facilities that is more restrictive 6than the sound limitations established by the Illinois 7Pollution Control Board under 35 Ill. Adm. Code Parts 900, 8901, and 910. Additionally, in accordance with Section 25 of 9the Environmental Protection Act, a participating property, 10participating residence, nonparticipating property, 11nonparticipating residence, or any combination of those 12properties or residences may waive enforcement of the rules 13adopted by the Illinois Pollution Control Board under 35 Ill. 14Adm. Code Parts 900, 901, and 910 by written waiver that 15complies with the applicable directive established in Section 1625 of the Environmental Protection Act and is recorded in the 17Office of the Recorder of the county in which the 18participating property, participating residence, 19nonparticipating property, or nonparticipating residence is 20located. Once recorded, such a waiver shall be binding on any 21current and future owners, residents, lessees, invitees, and 22users of the participating property, participating residence, 23nonparticipating property, or nonparticipating residence for 24enforcement purposes. An owner of any participating residence 25or nonparticipating residence shall disclose the existence of 26such a waiver to any lessee before entering any new lease for   SB3629- 28 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1the residence. 2    A seller or transferor of a participating property, 3participating residence, nonparticipating property, 4nonparticipating residence, or any combination of those 5properties or residences shall disclose the existence of such 6a waiver to any buyer or transferee before any sale or transfer 7of the property. If disclosure of the waiver occurs after the 8buyer has made an offer to purchase the property, the seller 9shall disclose the existence of the waiver before accepting 10the buyer's offer and shall (1) allow the buyer an opportunity 11to review the disclosure and (2) inform the buyer that the 12buyer has the right to amend the buyer's offer. 13    (g) A county may not place any restriction on the 14installation or use of a commercial wind energy facility or a 15commercial solar energy facility unless it adopts an ordinance 16that complies with this Section. A county may not establish 17siting standards for supporting facilities that preclude 18development of commercial wind energy facilities or commercial 19solar energy facilities. 20    A request for siting approval or a special use permit for a 21commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 22facility, or modification of an approved siting or special use 23permit, shall be approved if the request is in compliance with 24the standards and conditions imposed in this Act, the zoning 25ordinance adopted consistent with this Act, and the conditions 26imposed under State and federal statutes and regulations.   SB3629- 29 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1    (h) A county may not adopt zoning regulations that 2disallow, permanently or temporarily, commercial wind energy 3facilities or commercial solar energy facilities from being 4developed or operated in any district zoned to allow 5agricultural or industrial uses. 6    (i) (Blank). 7    (i-5) All siting approval or special use permit 8application fees for a commercial wind energy facility or 9commercial solar energy facility must be reasonable. Fees that 10do not exceed $5,000 per each megawatt of nameplate capacity 11of the energy facility, up to a maximum of $125,000, shall be 12considered presumptively reasonable. A county may also require 13reimbursement from the applicant for any reasonable expenses 14incurred by the county in processing the siting approval or 15special use permit application in excess of the maximum fee. A 16siting approval or special use permit shall not be subject to 17any time deadline to start construction or obtain a building 18permit of less than 5 years from the date of siting approval or 19special use permit approval. A county shall allow an applicant 20to request an extension of the deadline based upon reasonable 21cause for the extension request. The exemption shall not be 22unreasonably withheld, conditioned, or denied.23    (i-10) A county may require, for a commercial wind energy 24facility or commercial solar energy facility, a single 25building permit and a reasonable permit fee for the facility 26which includes all supporting facilities. County building   SB3629- 30 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1permit fees for commercial wind energy facility or commercial 2solar energy facility that do not exceed $5,000 per each 3megawatt of nameplate capacity of the energy facility, up to a 4maximum of $75,000, shall be considered presumptively 5reasonable. A county may also require reimbursement from the 6applicant for any reasonable expenses incurred by the county 7in processing the building permit in excess of the maximum 8fee. A county may require an applicant, upon start of 9construction of the facility, to maintain liability insurance 10that is commercially reasonable and consistent with prevailing 11industry standards for similar energy facilities.12    (j) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a county 13shall not require standards for construction, decommissioning, 14or deconstruction of a commercial wind energy facility or 15commercial solar energy facility or related financial 16assurances that are more restrictive than those included in 17the Department of Agriculture's standard wind farm 18agricultural impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, or 19standard solar agricultural impact mitigation agreement, 20version 8.19.19, as applicable and in effect on December 31, 212022. The amount of any decommissioning payment shall be in 22accordance with the financial assurance required by those 23agricultural impact mitigation agreements. 24    (j-5) A commercial wind energy facility or a commercial 25solar energy facility shall file a farmland drainage plan with 26the county and impacted drainage districts outlining how   SB3629- 31 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1surface and subsurface drainage of farmland will be restored 2during and following construction or deconstruction of the 3facility. The plan is to be created independently by the 4facility developer and shall include the location of any 5potentially impacted drainage district facilities to the 6extent this information is publicly available from the county 7or the drainage district, plans to repair any subsurface 8drainage affected during construction or deconstruction using 9procedures outlined in the agricultural impact mitigation 10agreement entered into by the commercial wind energy facility 11owner or commercial solar energy facility owner, and 12procedures for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 13affected during construction or deconstruction. All surface 14and subsurface damage shall be repaired as soon as reasonably 15practicable. 16    (k) A county may not condition approval of a commercial 17wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility on a 18property value guarantee and may not require a facility owner 19to pay into a neighboring property devaluation escrow account. 20    (l) A county may require certain vegetative screening 21between a commercial solar energy facility and 22nonparticipating residences. A county may not require earthen 23berms or similar structures. Vegetative screening requirements 24shall be commercially reasonable and limited in height at full 25maturity to avoid reduction of the productive energy output of 26the commercial solar energy facility. A county may not require   SB3629- 32 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1vegetative screening to exceed 5 feet in height when first 2installed or prior to commercial operation date. The screening 3requirements shall take into account the size and location of 4the facility, visibility from nonparticipating residences, 5compatibility of native plant species, cost and feasibility of 6installation and maintenance, and industry standards and best 7practices for commercial solar energy facilities. 8    (m) A county may set blade tip height limitations for wind 9towers in commercial wind energy facilities but may not set a 10blade tip height limitation that is more restrictive than the 11height allowed under a Determination of No Hazard to Air 12Navigation by the Federal Aviation Administration under 14 CFR 13Part 77.14    (n) A county may require that a commercial wind energy 15facility owner or commercial solar energy facility owner 16provide:17        (1) the results and recommendations from consultation 18    with the Illinois Department of Natural Resources that are 19    obtained through the Ecological Compliance Assessment Tool 20    (EcoCAT) or a comparable successor tool; and21        (2) (blank). 22    (o) A county may require a commercial wind energy facility 23or commercial solar energy facility to adhere to the 24recommendations provided by the Illinois Department of Natural 25Resources in an EcoCAT natural resource review report under 17 26Ill. Adm. Code Part 1075.   SB3629- 33 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1    (p) A county may require a facility owner to:2        (1) demonstrate avoidance of protected lands as 3    identified by the Illinois Department of Natural Resources 4    and the Illinois Nature Preserve Commission; or5        (2) consider the recommendations of the Illinois 6    Department of Natural Resources for setbacks from 7    protected lands, including areas identified by the 8    Illinois Nature Preserve Commission.9    (q) A county may require that a facility owner provide 10evidence of consultation with the Illinois State Historic 11Preservation Office to assess potential impacts on 12State-registered historic sites under the Illinois State 13Agency Historic Resources Preservation Act. 14    (r) To maximize community benefits, including, but not 15limited to, reduced stormwater runoff, flooding, and erosion 16at the ground mounted solar energy system, improved soil 17health, and increased foraging habitat for game birds, 18songbirds, and pollinators, a county may (1) require a 19commercial solar energy facility owner to plant, establish, 20and maintain for the life of the facility vegetative ground 21cover, consistent with the goals of the Pollinator-Friendly 22Solar Site Act and (2) require the submittal of a vegetation 23management plan that is in compliance with the agricultural 24impact mitigation agreement in the application to construct 25and operate a commercial solar energy facility in the county 26if the vegetative ground cover and vegetation management plan   SB3629- 34 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1comply with the requirements of the underlying agreement with 2the landowner or landowners where the facility will be 3constructed. 4    No later than 90 days after January 27, 2023 (the 5effective date of Public Act 102-1123), the Illinois 6Department of Natural Resources shall develop guidelines for 7vegetation management plans that may be required under this 8subsection for commercial solar energy facilities. The 9guidelines must include guidance for short-term and long-term 10property management practices that provide and maintain native 11and non-invasive naturalized perennial vegetation to protect 12the health and well-being of pollinators. 13    (s) If a facility owner enters into a road use agreement 14with the Illinois Department of Transportation, a road 15district, or other unit of local government relating to a 16commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 17facility, the road use agreement shall require the facility 18owner to be responsible for (i) the reasonable cost of 19improving roads used by the facility owner to construct the 20commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy 21facility and (ii) the reasonable cost of repairing roads used 22by the facility owner during construction of the commercial 23wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 24so that those roads are in a condition that is safe for the 25driving public after the completion of the facility's 26construction. Roadways improved in preparation for and during   SB3629- 35 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1the construction of the commercial wind energy facility or 2commercial solar energy facility shall be repaired and 3restored to the improved condition at the reasonable cost of 4the developer if the roadways have degraded or were damaged as 5a result of construction-related activities.6    The road use agreement shall not require the facility 7owner to pay costs, fees, or charges for road work that is not 8specifically and uniquely attributable to the construction of 9the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 10energy facility. No road district or other unit of local 11government may request or require permit fees, fines, or other 12payment obligations as a requirement for a road use agreement 13with a facility owner unless the amount of the reasonable 14permit fee or payment is equivalent to the amount of actual 15expenses incurred by the road district or other unit of local 16government for negotiating, executing, constructing, or 17implementing the road use agreement. The road use agreement 18shall not require any road work to be performed by or paid for 19by the facility owner that is not specifically and uniquely 20attributable to the road improvements required for the 21construction of the commercial wind energy facility or the 22commercial solar energy facility or the restoration of the 23roads used by the facility owner during construction-related 24activities. 25    (s-5) The facility owner shall also compensate landowners 26for crop losses or other agricultural damages resulting from   SB3629- 36 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1damage to the drainage system caused by the construction of 2the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 3energy facility. The commercial wind energy facility owner or 4commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair or pay for 5the repair of all damage to the subsurface drainage system 6caused by the construction of the commercial wind energy 7facility or the commercial solar energy facility in accordance 8with the agriculture impact mitigation agreement requirements 9for repair of drainage. The commercial wind energy facility 10owner or commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair 11or pay for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 12caused by the construction or deconstruction of the commercial 13wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 14as soon as reasonably practicable. 15    (t) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a facility 16owner with siting approval from a county to construct a 17commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 18facility is authorized to cross or impact a drainage system, 19including, but not limited to, drainage tiles, open drainage 20ditches, culverts, and water gathering vaults, owned or under 21the control of a drainage district under the Illinois Drainage 22Code without obtaining prior agreement or approval from the 23drainage district in accordance with the farmland drainage 24plan required by subsection (j-5). 25    (u) The amendments to this Section adopted in Public Act 26102-1123 do not apply to: (1) an application for siting   SB3629- 37 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1approval or for a special use permit for a commercial wind 2energy facility or commercial solar energy facility if the 3application was submitted to a unit of local government before 4January 27, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123); 5(2) a commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar 6energy facility if the facility owner has submitted an 7agricultural impact mitigation agreement to the Department of 8Agriculture before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 9Public Act 102-1123); (3) a commercial wind energy or 10commercial solar energy development on property that is 11located within an enterprise zone certified under the Illinois 12Enterprise Zone Act, that was classified as industrial by the 13appropriate zoning authority on or before January 27, 2023, 14and that is located within 4 miles of the intersection of 15Interstate 88 and Interstate 39; or (4) a commercial wind 16energy or commercial solar energy development on property in 17Madison County that is located within the area that has as its 18northern boundary the portion of Drexelius Road that is 19between the intersection of Drexelius Road and Wolf Road and 20the intersection of Drexelius Road and Fosterburg Road, that 21has as its eastern boundary the portion of Fosterburg Road 22that is between the intersection of Fosterburg Road and 23Drexelius Road and the intersection of Fosterburg Road and 24Wolf Road, and that has as its southern and western boundaries 25the portion of Wolf Road that is between the intersection of 26Fosterburg Road and Wolf Road and the intersection of   SB3629- 38 -LRB104 20614 RTM 34106 b1Drexelius Road and Wolf Road; or (5) a commercial wind energy 2development, a commercial solar energy development, or an 3energy storage development on property that is located South 4of Interstate Route 70 and within Edwards County, Franklin 5County, Hamilton County, Jackson County, Jefferson County, 6Madison County, Monroe County, Perry County, Randolph County, 7St. Clair County, Union County, Wabash County, Washington 8County, Wayne County, or White County.9(Source: P.A. 103-81, eff. 6-9-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 10104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-458, eff. 6-1-26.) 11    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 12changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 13that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 14represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 15not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 16made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 17Public Act.